 
 
I believe in B-ball...
 
 
.... although I gotta say the Knicks are givin' me agita this year.

See Steve Rushin's great SI article:
 http://sportsillustrated.cnn.com/inside_game/steve_rushin/news/2002/12/03/air_and_space/ 

PS I'm a fan of both the Knicks and the Celtics and, really, any team that's any good and/or fun to watch. I guess you could say I'm a lil fickle.  
 
 
right

on

I have been looking forward to Christmas this year ever since (and only since) I found out it would be the first regular season meeting between the Lakers and Kings since the travesty that was the 2002 Western Conference Finals. Doubly so since I tuned into the preseason game (yes, I watch preseason games) between the two teams that degenerated into an off-court brawl before five minutes had elapsed. No nice Christmas cheer for this doggy; basketball bloodlust will be the order of the day.
 
 
I'll take anybody except the Lakers. Would like to see Houston do good this year. Want San Antonio, but they keep tripping over their own feet.

Boston looks good for the first time in a long/long winters night. Don't think the Knicks stand a chance.
 
 
Is it the bloodlust that scares everybody away?
 
 
Not me! I dunno who I'm for, though. I'm usually regional, and was in L.A. for their renaissance under Phil, who I have allegiance to as a former Bull fan. But they have always irked me a bit, now more than usual, and I'm not in L.A. anymore. I was impressed with the Kings last year, so what the hey.

Meanwhile, I have to say the sports center of my brain is currently overwhelmed with the PACKERS. Did anyone see the game on Sunday? Good ol' Gilbert Brown, bless him, just standing innocently on the sideline and the 49'ers Jeff Craig plowing directly into him and getting sufficiently discombobulated that he couldn't get a drive together to win the game? Brett lookin' goooooooooood and throwing bullets in the pouring rain? I haven't had this much fun watching them since '96-'97.  
 
 
I may have to get into the Pack, soz. The patiobitch got a letter of acceptance (very early, and personally signed) from the U Wisc. law school yesterday. Which pretty much narrows the hunt down to Sacto (go Kings), Madison (go Bucks! -- nah, Kahr's a tool), or Athens (uh, yeah, whatever).

Sorry for the digress, there, jes...
 
 
That's so great! Congrats to... er... (can't bring myself to use your term of endearment) the patio gal! I'm tellin' ya, dude, you would LOVE Madison.

It's way more a football town than basketball, though -- the Bucks are doing OK, but just OK, and with no particular prospects. But between the Packers and the Badgers (not so great last year, usually stellar), there's a lot of good stuff football-wise.

Congrats again, though -- that's a big deal. UW-Madison Law School is really well-regarded. (Jes can probably give a more neutral view on that -- I'm just gung-ho on all things Madison. If you couldn't tell.   )
 
 
Football, except in the form of highlights or the old Bills hurry-up offense, bores me to tears. Too much time with nothing going on. And Karl (did I really call him Kahr?) should be fired from the Bucks for the way he coached the U.S. national team -- never mind the way he's coached the pathetic Bucks, who are suddenly greater underachievers than the Trailblazers, and that's going some.

(But, then, I'm gung-ho on basketball. If you couldn't tell.)

Anyway, still gotta get word on my app to Wisconsin, and elsewhere...
 
 
Oh, Karl. Yeah. He's a doofus.

I have some kind of multiple-sports-personality. I shift gears. Right now I'm in full Packers mode, and will be through the playoffs at least. It probably would be different if I had a b-ball team I was completely for. But when the Packer's season is over, I'll switch to b-ball, and then I say all those same things -- football's slow, it's boring, there's so much less drama, you can't even see the guy's faces, you can't judge a lift of an eyebrow and decide whether it's an incipent drive to the basket or a fake, etc. I find basketball infinitely more esthetically pleasing, and if it wasn't for the Packers, I probably wouldn't be such a football fan. But Brett-to-Driver on a crossing pattern.... gorjuss.
 
 
Man, I can't believe you'd rather watch that than the Bulls' latest collection of tall, skinny teenagers!
 
 
Hey, a digression in spawts is no problem.

Yeah, I know, the Knicks are pretty woeful (sorry, Mr. Jespah). The Celts have been looking good, though, but I'm always cautious about too much rooting for local teams as, whenever I get interested, it always seems that they start to tank. Hmmm. I guess I have a rooting hex, or something like that.

Could never get into football, not even last year's championship Pats. 'Course, that's what made 'em champs - the fact that I did not root for them.

Anyone got a team they don't want me to root for? I can't guarantee victory but I figure, hey, it can't hurt.

Like rally caps, yanno.
 
 
If you could, please refrain from rooting for the Mavs or the Kings. I'd like to see them in the conference finals this year. And I'll be in touch with you about some very particular horses I'd like you to root FOR, next time I go to the track.
 
 
I'll do my best. Sometimes the mojo works, sometimes it doesn't.

I hereby want the Mavs and the Kings to lose. Perhaps I should burn incense or something, to make it official?
 
 
Nah, burning things just leads to light fines, "rehab," and diminished free agent contracts in the NBA.
 
 
Don't be so hard on George Karl. When he coached the Sonics, it was said that Gary Payton, a great player but a real hothead, respected his coach because he knew that Karl was just crazy enough to take a swing at him if it came to that...  
 
 
Could be. I actually liked him back then, but I just sat there scratching my head looking at his decisions this summer; and last year's team falling out of the playoff hunt altogether -- man.

(For that matter, I've never thought Adelman was a very good coach, but his players love him and they're doing great, most of the time, so there you go...)
 
 
My heart still goes to my college baseball team. The University of Oklahoma Sooners.

But, I have been very faithful to Huston, as I mentioned earlier. Am glad to see them get Chu, this guy may be the talent of the future. Look forward to seeing him against Shaq in a couple of years when he gets the American footing down. He already has some great moves and some very interesting shots. How will he be when faces the same team 7 times in 10 days?
 
 
Yao was a stud last night. And a couple of the passes he's made the last couple of games were incredible. That touch pass on the inbounds play with time running down last night? A thing of beauty. I watched him early in the season and thought the Rockets were out of their heads -- thought they'd found the second coming of Shawn Bradley -- but this kid has some serious court sense. He's gonna be a player.
 
 
I remember earlier in the year he did a no look pass, it looked like between some defenders legs - at a full gallop. That is where this man is gonna be something. He moves up and down the court - can he continue to do it? That is a lot of mass to move around, but will he have to bulk up for the NBA? That'll slow him down!
 
 
They've been waiting for a guy seven and a half feet tall who wasn't an absolute fish for a long time, and this may be him. As long as he makes it up and down -- look at Sabonis in the second half of his career; he was very effective running about as fast as a plump toddler. I'm jumping on the Yao bandwagon...
 
 
Don't forget that Sabonis also played many years in Russia. He is pretty old. He also to me doesn't seem to be 7 feet, that is probably because his vertical jump is about 3 inches. Yao has got a pretty good jump, but I don't think they want him to do to much jumping. The weight on the knees. I was a major Olajuwon fan, I always felt the official were rough on him.
 
 
Oh, Hakeem was dreamy. I loved Patrick for a very very long time, though, that poor noble warrior. Watched both of 'em since Phi Slamma Jamma days.
 
 
I always wanted the twin towers concept to work; but, unfortunately, Ralph Sampsons knees just wouldn't make it. That is the weak link between all that height and weight on a human knee joint. Put the extra pressure of the game and boom. Patrick also had major knee problems. Kept him limited to floor duty and slow up court movement.
 
 
Ah, Patrick. Was supposed to be the savior of the Knicks. Hmm, guess not. But yes, it was his knees that finally did him in. I think we won't see many good big men until the knee problem is somehow solved (artificial joints, anyone?). And then, if a big man always has to be somehow engineered, what do we do? Start knee replacements in High School? Seems pretty disturbing to me.

Ah, BillW, are you a Boomer Sooner?
 
 
I can't forgive Ewing for introducing that extra step into the move across the lane that all the hulking cretins (you there, Shaq?) now exploit. Felt the Knicks gave him an incredibly raw deal, though, and the karma from that is the reason they suck now.

Olajuwon was unbelievable during that championship run of theirs. Balletic footwork and an ungodly sense of his defender's balance. You know he actually came to basketball fairly late? He was a soccer goalie growing up.

Anyway, Manute Bol never lost use of his knees. Perhaps he could be your prototype, Jes? (Watched 'Nute a lot growing up in Northern California, when he was launching 30 foot threes with the Warriors.)
 
 
jespah, Sooner born and Sooner bred and when I die I'm Sooner dead, go Oklahoma, go Oklahoma, go Oklahoma - OKU!

Such wonderful, thought provoking, intellectual words. Yes I am a Boomer-Sooner.

I think they give Shaq far too much. His arms are are like tree trunks, and he is allowed to use forearm shivers too get room.

Olajuwon was unbelievable. He stole the ball from guards. He walked on at the University of Houston campus after taking a cab from the airport. Never touched a basketball before. He was a world class goalie, so he always had good hand control. I don't know why the refs always gave him hell.
 
 
 
You know he actually came to basketball fairly late?
 

Yup, I wonder if the late entry into basketball helped him, knee-wise. (Did you know he was "Akeem" for years and years because he was too modest to correct someone's erroneous spelling?)

I totally agree about karma. Patrick worked SO hard, though.

Speaking of stretching the rules, though, did you see Selena Robert's piece on Michael? Really disturbing. She's basically suggesting that Michael never got called for all his travels et al because he was in with the refs, to the point where they were out procuring ladies for him:

 http://www.nytimes.com/2002/12/15/sports/basketball/15ROBE.html 
 
 
That's shocking. I thought he went from Akeem to Hakeem upon conversion to Islam. (joke)

Hey, I think the business side of the NBA -- including the officiating and the hefty fines handed out for criticism of it -- is as a crooked as Shaq's back when he "dislodges" his defender. Hate the league. Love the game.
 
 
Heehehehehe...

Yeah, I've certainly been like "huh???" about many calls (or lack thereof), but this article was an eye-opener for me. Yikes.
 
 
Re NBA reffing: It's more an art than a science. When I was in training to be a youth b-ball ref some years ago, we were told not to use NBA refs as examples. High school and college refs pay closer attention to the rules. For that and other reasons, I much prefer the college game.

Go Ducks! (Though they were trounced by the Bearcats earlier this week.)
 
 
I read an article a while back on the way the refs are trained, and there is one very crucial difference between officiating the NBA -- and it was given as something of an excuse for inattention to traveling, palming, and C. Webb's favorite offensive foul -- holding off the opponent with the off-arm as you go up for a shot. Unlike officials at every other level, NBA refs are trained to watch the defensive player rather than the offensive player.

Still, it just seems to me that a lot of it is straight-up pandering to preferred players and teams. Steve Javy comes most immediately to mind, though Nick "Knick" Bavetta earned quite a reputation for favoring a particular team in the tristate area on crucial plays...
 
 
I think part of why NBA refs act as they do is that they're part of the entertainment package at a game. Not as bad as refs in pro wrestling, but there are some resemblances! Was it Mindy Rudolph who used to race down the court dramatically signalling a foul? Now that was theater!
 
 
Good point, D'art! (Theater/ sport.)
 
 
There's something to that. There used to be a ref (or umpire, whatever) in the NFL (back when I watched it on Monday nights) who gave the best "First dowwwwn." That's football, though, and there's a lot of lulls in the action where I don't mind seeing a ref's personality. In the ebb and flow of an NBA game, you shouldn't even notice the officials.
 
 
You are so right, patiodog, about how refs shouldn't be noticed. Less is more, except you can't let a game get out of hand. Making too many calls and being flamboyant is a great way to get the attention of players, coaches and fans (i.e., parents at kids games)--and then the fun really begins!
 
 
I've got some sympathy for you officiating types; I reffed a little league game -- just one -- when I was in high school, and I don't envy anybody the thankless task of doing that.

Wouldn't mind coaching a kids roundball team someday, though...
 
 
Joey Crawford was Hakeem and the Rockets worst official. But, I do know it is in the eyes of the beholder. I had season tickets 8 rows up under the goal. You could hear the grunts, groans and all the skin smacks. It was unbelievable. If a ball game was called for all the real fouls, there would be no action. So now the referees get to call what they want and it would be impossible to see everything. Dennis Rodman use to just push off for everything, no wonder he couldn't keep a woman or a man!
 
 
What amazed me about Rodman was his ability to be simultaneously loathed by and favored by the officials. And for such an unstable human being he certainly displayed a remarkable intuitiveness about the psychological shortcomings of the guys he guarded.

(Sorry I pop in on everything, but I haven't found anybody since I've moved here who really knows basketball. They watch the Sonics when they're winning, boo at every call that goes against them, and that's about it. One thing that I miss about Chicago........)
 
 
The thing about Rodman for me is I have never seen anyone play defense like that man and still be ready to hit the boards. The #1 defensive man ever, and play so supid like he did. I think the refs were scared of him. He didn't back down and got fouls for just a look. I really loved to watch him play and such a disappointment. The guy was pyscho!
 
 
He was a GREAT defensive player, GREAT rebounder, and great at the mind games, too. He let that all get the best of him, but I loved (when he was with the Bulls, not while he was with the Pistons) how he just totally freaked everyone out before he'd actually done anything.
 
 
Hey, patiodog, reffing kids can be fun--I recommend it. The young ones (10-13) are pretty cool. Not old enough to have real attitudes, but working on it. The parents can be a bit much, but really, very few are bothersome. At least no one ever took a swing at me!
 
 
I believe in Cricket.
 
 
Any sport which stops for tea is not deserving of serious attention.
 
 
Tea breaks are nice, but I just don't see them going over well in hockey arenas.
 
 
OK, so Packers are done, I'm still mourning but I'll get over it, I'm shaking off the football funk and ready to get into b-ball mode. If the Bulls were just a little less pitiful... (I have always liked Jalen Rose, anyway.   )
 
 
I actually got back into the foozball for a while watching the 49ers (my old home team) take apart the Giants in the second half. Why can't the game always be that entertaining?
 
 
sozebe, looks like your into basketball again!
 
 
I like to see a basketball player go five days without eating!!!!
 
 
Well, there's Ramadan. But you don't mention nights. ;-)
 
 
Well, it's that time of year again and so I brought this thread back to life!

I hope my team gets to the sweet 16!

And, rah for the Rockets, 21 in a row and counting.....
 
 
the C's plowed through texas -- something no one's done since '01...
 
 
My team won their first round in March Madness last night. Go Sooners.

NBA ~ I'm kinda into Houston, you're Celtics stopped the streak, of course, it's two loses now  
 
 
never been much of a college hoops fan...

i think the rockets won after dropping those two.
they have their hands full tonight with phoenix.
the C's can help 'em out by knocking off the hornets...
 
 
Finally a sport I don't care a whit about. Oh, but wait, is UCLA still in the tourney?
 
 
yep -- they play in about 45 minutes...

 http://sports-ak.espn.go.com/ncb/tournament/bracket 
 
 
Thank you! Now on to the Sweet Sixteen..
 
 
OK then...

that was a tad close. Reminds me of the old days.. (I went there '60-64. a terrific time for B-ball under Wooden).
 
 
One an done for my team and my brackets have crumbled.....  
 
 
not to be out-done by their Big Bro's in baseball & football, the C's are steam-rolling their way to the finals.

in the space of one year they went from a pathetic 24-win lottery team to the best team in the league (62 wins and counting), the best one-year turnaround in NBA history...
 
 
Congrats to yhe Jayhawks ~ and now; turning my attention to help my Rockets win a Championship in the 21st century.
 
 
the C's lost 3 times to the hawks down in hotlanta.
would be a major embarrassment if they screw up game 7 this afternoon on the parquet...
 
 
Garbage time. And it's the third period. What a sad excuse for a game.

This has got to be the most disrespected, unappetizing, what-the-hell-am-I-
-even-watching-this-for game seven in the history of pro sports.
 
 
i liked the way rondo kept playing after the flagrant.
tough kid...
 
 
the C's continue to feast at home / starve on the road.
has a team ever gone all the way winning only @ home?
i think not...
 
 
no team has ever won the title without winning at least 3 road games. so the announcers have said...
 
 
C's vs P's
great series.
i'd almost be disappointed if it didn't go 7...
 
 
Oh my god, a Boston/Lakers final would be incredible. And it looks pretty damn likely too! Woohoo! I don't even know who I would want in that series, but the Lakers are looking pretty unstoppable right now, and I LOVE the way Kobe is playing.
 
 
Pistons are not hitting on all cylinders. Prince is great, but without Chauncy.... no chance.
 
 
Yep. It sure looks like the Pistons/Spurs era of domination is coming to a close. Thank god. New blood!
 
 
prince needs to load up on some burgers and shakes -- he looks anorexic...
 
 
He's always looked like that. He's a heck of a b-ball player though. Plays way above the top of the backboard.
 
 
 
Oh my god, a Boston/Lakers final would be incredible. And it looks pretty damn likely too! Woohoo!
 

C's in 5...
 
 
man, dumars is strict !

flip took detroit to the conference finals 3 years in a row.
what does he get for his trouble?
his hat handed to him...
 
 
Looks like Billups and Wallace may be the next former Pistons
 
 
Well, I enjoyed the first game immensely, even though the wrong team won. Both teams looked good and there was some nice drama with Pierce getting hurt and then coming back in the third quarter. I dig it.
 
 
two more or less evenly matched teams.
C's controlled the boards, and shut down kobe when it mattered.

this sucker could go 7...
 
 
Nigel won tix at work so we got to be there. Wild time.
 
 
Well, so far the best players for the Celtics tonight have been the f*cking officials. I guess now we see why they were so tough at home.
 
 
So far, with 7:00 left to go in the third, the Celtics have shot 24 free throws and the Lakers have shot TWO.

What a bunch of f*cking bullshit.
 
 
Glad you're enjoying the game.
 
 
That was two and a half hours of my life STOLEN by horrible officiating. I imagine that would have been a good close game without those ASSH*LES.

I mean, the officials have been somewhat shitty throughout the playoffs, but at least they usually miss calls on both sides of the ball so it evens out. That was pitifully one-sided.
 
 
Lakers fan, kicky?
 
 
dammit, we almost handed them the game.
every time leon powe touched the ball he either made a bucket or got fouled... nice !

i agree -- the officiating sucked...
 
 
A2K time stamps are off
 
 
 
Lakers fan, kicky?
 

I admit I'm leaning towards the Lakers just a bit, but I actually like both of these teams. I just want it to be decided by the play on the court and not the officials.
 
 
I hear ya. funny thing is, I was a dyed in the wool Laker fan all through the 80's and part of the 90s, until the era of Shaq and kobe. And all those years I rooted against the Celts. But I like KG and I hope he can get a ring this year.
 
 
I see the Lakers winning one game. Detroit was the team to beat, and the Celtics beat them.
 
 
Welcome back from the Dark Side, snood.
 
 
Dark side of what? Being a Lakers fan?
 
 
 
Dark side of what? Being a Lakers fan?
 

He means the Lakers are Evil.

Not much of a Star Wars fan are you, snood?
 
 
 
 
Dark side of what? Being a Lakers fan?
 

He means the Lakers are Evil.

Not much of a Star Wars fan are you, snood?
 

Uh, yeah - heard of it... In fact, the term "dark side" became part of the vernacular because of StarWars, and is used widely enough that someone might even inquire as to context and meaning, when it's used.

Besides, the individual who used it is certainly capable of speaking for him/her self, and since you have been crystal clear you care not at all for my commentary or opinions...

why are you addressing me, asswipe?
 
 
 
 
 
Dark side of what? Being a Lakers fan?
 

He means the Lakers are Evil.

Not much of a Star Wars fan are you, snood?
 

Uh, yeah - heard of it... In fact, the term "dark side" became part of the vernacular because of StarWars, and is used widely enough that someone might even inquire as to context and meaning, when it's used.
 

Oh... because it seems to me if you were aware of "the Dark Side" from the Star Wars movies, you wouldn't need to ask the question.

 
Besides, the individual who used it is certainly capable of speaking for him/her self, and since you have been crystal clear you care not at all for my commentary or opinions...

why are you addressing me, asswipe?
 

Really? When did I express that? It is true I don't care for many of your opinions (which is true of many leftists I converse with on the political threads), but that doesn't mean I'm not interested in hearing your opinions on other matters, or certainly chatting with you on other subjects unrelated to politics... say in a basketball thread. However, it appears you view me as an enemy, to where you cannot disengage yourself from your paranoia and hostility towards me and just interact as people. Well, I have now reevaluated the utility in attempting to engage in any friendly conversation with you at all. If you want to be hostile in all of our interactions, I can certainly accommodate you.

I'm obviously addressing you because I enjoy conversing with cranky black men with chips on their shoulder.

God you're a dickhead.
 
 
Gentlemen!

I started this topic. That may have been a while ago but I still did so. And I like peace in my topics.

I cannot prevent any of you from posting here or control your postings or make you all sit and hold hands and sing Kumbaya but I do ask as a personal favor that the sniping stay off this topic.

Thank you.

We now return you to your regularly scheduled Celtic victory, already in progress.
 
 
 
I cannot prevent any of you from posting here or control your postings or make you all sit and hold hands and sing Kumbaya but I do ask as a personal favor that the sniping stay off this topic.
 

No problem, jes. I didn't come here to snipe, or to take pot shots from those who wish to.

Go Celts!
 
 
 
 
 
Can someone give me the 30-second version of the officiating fiasco in the NBA finals?
 
 
This official named Tim Donaghy got caught fixing calls so that people he knew who bet on games would win, or something to that effect. So he now has alleged that he has information on a whole bunch of games that were fixed by the league in order to either give favorable calls to certain "star" players, steer games in the direction of certain teams, and other such nastiness.

This link has more info.

 http://blogs.rockymountainnews.com/rockytalklive/archives/2008/06/do_you_believe_nba_games_were.html 

In my opinion, although Donaghy has no credibility at all and is a complete scumbag, I can easily believe that star players have gotten special treatment, and after seeing the officiating at the game in Boston last sunday and the game in L.A. on Tuesday, I don't think it's a stretch to believe that the league might be subtly suggesting that home teams get the better of the calls, or that they might otherwise try to influence a playoff game or series to be more competitive than it might actually be. In fact, star players getting the benefit of the doubt on foul calls, although obviously totally unfair, has been going on for so long that it is considered a part of the game by most people who follow the NBA at this point.

But I still can't help it. I like the game, and will suspend disbelief for as long as possible to allow myself some enjoyment of the damn playoffs, and as long as the officials don't make it too obvious, I will just have to live with it.

Anyway, let's hope for a good not-too-obviously-rigged game tonight.
 
 
Good luck with that.

I bleed green for the finals.

(a French Lick thing)

Rock
 
 
I gotcher french lick right here, dude.

Ha, actually I have absolutely nothing against the Celtics. I just like the Lakers a little bit more this year. Plus, I would like a seven game series, so it would be nice if they tied it up tonight.

Let's go Lakers!
 
 
If someone could find the real Ray Allen, this would all be moot, but for the officials...

RH
 
 
Thanks, Kicky. I agree about business as usual. Why, the old Bad Boy Pistons got away with all kinds of crap when they were playing at home.
 
 
Ooh, we got us a good one, folks. 73-71 Lakers going into the 4th. Celtics ended the 3rd on a 21-3 run. So what are you waiting for? Get off this stupid website and turn the f---ing game on!
 
 
Woo hoo!

What a comeback!
 
 
Wow. That was amazing. De-FENSE. Great game.
 
 
Can one of you Jamokes give me a score, I gave up TV to go along with loose women...

RH
 
 
97 - 91. Celts. Sick comeback. Watch it on Sportscenter. Oh, I forgot. You can't. Hehehe...
 
 
Crap - I was so tired from work, I couldn't even focus enough to watch it (plus I was disgruntled toward b-ball by the Donaghy thing). In my fatigued state I was sure the 'fix' would be in to make it a 7 game series. doesn't sound like that's the way it was played out, though - sounds like a good game. Crap.
 
 
I FELL ASLEEP!
AAAAAAARRRRRGGGGHHHHH!!!!
 
 
me too.

i missed the amazing comeback-for-the-ages...
 
 
I bet that one announcer who was all "it's 2-2, I'll take a xx point lead anyday", is eating crow for breakfast.
 
 
It was such a classic come-from-behind that they are going to replay it tonight (on ESPN I think).
 
 
Ooh, if you find out more (time, etc.) can you post it?

I haven't been watching but I don't like Kobe and I do like Garnett so I'd like to watch this one... (Plus I just like b-ball and haven't watched in forever.)
 
 
 
Ooh, if you find out more (time, etc.) can you post it?
 

Looks like Game 4 (Lakers/Celts) is on youtube:

 http://youtube.com/watch?v=AdOCiA4-Gyg 
 
 
that would be game 4 from 1984...

i'm glad the fakers are wearing the traditional gold uni's @ home, not those atrocious white ones...
 
 
I thought something looked different.
 
 
Celtics are looking like serious badasses on defense tonight. As usual. It's looking grim for my hopes for a game seven!
 
 
the boys are having their halftime PBJ's...
 
 
Heh. I don't foresee the Lakers coming back tonight. This Celtics team is a monster.
 
 
77 - 48 with six minutes left in the 3rd. Is it garbage time yet?
 
 
rondo picked a great time to have his best game as a pro...
 
 
It's a 30 point lead with three minutes left in the third. Okay, here comes the comeback...right...NOW!
 
 
the fakers aren't even trying...
 
 
Guess not.
 
 
Congrats Boston...

Now focus your energy on the Sox.  
 
 
Jesus, KG, I understand, you're happy, but please try to get a hold of yourself. I'm not sure, but I think he might have actually been speaking in tongues for a second there during that post-game interview.
 
 
Maybe a college degree would have helped ?
 
 
WOW! I never expected that.
 
 
that was a sweet win... i could watch that gatorade shower in super slo-mo a few thousand more times !

i've said it before, and i'll say it again --

we are so spoiled up here in Bahstin  
 
 
It was a sweet win if you're a Celtics fan.
It was an abomination if you're a basketball fan.
 
 
 
It was a sweet win if you're a Celtics fan.
It was an abomination if you're a basketball fan.
 

I don't know. I thought it was a good example of how a great defense can shut down an offense.

It was also an example of how to NOT put it on autopilot when you are 20 points ahead like Boston did in game 2.
 
 
the big green celtic foot stayed on the purple laker throat from the 2nd quarter on...
 
 
little early for a block-buster, ain't it?

 Pistons get Iverson for Billups, McDyess, Samb 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Whoa.
 
 
@jespah,

Whoa indeed. Looks like desperation in Detroit, and they don't make desperate moves.

(Mebbe Billups has some chronic injury issue we don't know about? Bad back, maybe?)
 
 
lil rajon rondo had a sick triple-double (16-13-17) last night.
C's (18-2) have won 10 straight...
 
 
C's still streakin' along -- 15 straight, 23-2 for the season.
three more dubya's and they tie for best record outta the shute.
needless to say am looking fwd to the x-mas day finals rematch...
 
 
Meanwhile, things are looking up for the Suns as they traded away Raja Bell and Boris Diaw for Jason Richardson. JR makes the Suns interesting again. I'll be at the Suns/Nuggets game this Saturday just to make sure.
 
 
@Ticomaya,

shaq has been putting up some eye-popping line scores lately...
 
 
well, the C's are off to a fast 6-0 start.

the D is sharp, the O is getting there as KG gets his wind back.
ainge wisely gave rondo his ka-ching.
the bench is deeper than the championship year 2007-08.

will be interesting to see if they can hold the suns to 90 or less (as they've done to the 1st 6 opponents) tomorrow night...
 
 
C's are a league-best 20-4, riding an 11-game win streak.
they are 12-1 on the road, having won 6 straight.

needless to say, it's fun watching a veteran team that knows how to close out games...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
needless to say, it's fun watching a veteran team that knows how to close out games...
 
aaaaaaaand soon thereafter they caught the injury bug and stopped playing well.
if i was the superstitious type, i'd say i put a lill ol' jinx on 'em.
but i'm not.

well, going against my better judgement, i plan to stay up for the late game tonight @ LAL.
i figure with kobe prolly out, the C's have a slim chance of staying in the game...
 
 
Celts and Lakers tonight?!? I'm there!

didya'll see the trace for Antawn Jamieson to the Cavs? I'm tellin' ya, that might be the clincher for Lebron's first Ring!
 
 
when's that all white league starting up, i can't really support the idea, but i should be able to follow the pace of the games
 
 
@snood,

they will be very tough to beat at full strength, no doubt.
i'm just glad they didn't get stoudemire from phoenix, as was rumored last week...

i hear the C's are interested in little nate robinson to back up rondo.
if they can swing it, eddie house would go to the knicks...
 
 
C's brought enough D last night, and prevailed 87-86 -- despite being outscored in the 4th quarter 17-11...  
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Can't be too happy about them letting LAL -- sans Bryant -- back in the game after being up 10, though.
 
 
@patiodog,

at this point, a win is a win.
as presently constructed, they have zero chance of getting past the 2 nd round of the playoffs.

caught the end of nuggets-cavs.
another impressive road win...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

I'm expecting a lot from Jamison as soon as he learns that one play that constitutes an offense in Cleveland. Nobody finds the open spot away from the ball like that guy.

Though I'm sure Mike James can make it not work.
 
 
@patiodog,

he is working on the 'give it to bron-bron and get outta the way' play as we speak...

how soon before mcgrady is sent to the d'antoni dawghouse?
 
 
@Region Philbis,

The Cavs should have been scoring 120 a game with the personnel they had. It's amazing LeBron is able to do in that "system." They can play some shut-down D, though...

Re: Knicks... I don't even know. Not being in that part of the country, they're just another crap team to me, and I don't any more attention to them than you probably do to the Bucks. Something in this article (  http://sports.espn.go.com/boston/nba/news/story?id=4924052  ) about the trade amuses me, though: the writer talks about Eddie House "struggling" because he's only shooting 40% from 3. Yeah, I know, that's his specialty, but 1.2 points per shot from the floor is hardly struggling. It's above his career average and, over a career, would put him in the top 30 all time...

Edit: the writer's math is off, anywho. House is 64/167 from 3 -- 38.3%. Still an enviable percentage for most players.
 
 
@patiodog,

the thing that did house in was his inability to guard some of the quicker back-up PG's... plus he wasn't lighting up the scoreboard much this year.
a few times in '08 he led the team in scoring, and was an excellent 6th man.

lil' nate is an upgrade... he's 6 years younger, more athletic, more prolific.
celtic brass is already drooling over the option of leaving rondo in with nate and deploying the backcourt press...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

I agree Robinson's an upgrade -- though maybe a little less accustomed to giving up the ball than the C's would like. I just thought it was funny that he cited a pretty solid stat as evidence of slumping (and miscalculated it, at that).

Personally, I wouldn't put it past the Celtics to make a late season push if they can get everyone healthy and in rhythm in time for the playoffs. The Pistons and the Spurs of recent years were able to pull that off before age fully caught up with 'em.

Still, I'm very excited about Jamison in Cleveland. I'd been hoping they'd make that trade instead of for Stoudemire, who I think would clog up the lane even more than it already is and push Varejao and his manic energy to the bench for longer stretches.

(I'm a Kings fan, which pretty much makes me a free agent these days -- I just want to see good ball.)
 
 
@patiodog,

d'antoni, who tends to clash with strong-willed players, benched nate for a month; his first game back he poured in 40.
C's will look for him to take plenty of 2 nd unit shots.

they looked pretty good @ portland last night.
solid D throughout, but still too many lapses on O...

despite antawn's ugly ofer, he should make the cavs better...
 
 
The Celtics are on the warpath to the Championship!! Up 2 - 0 in the conference finals and they're up 22 points in Boston with less then 8 minutes left in the game!!
 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Celtics are 3-0 with their 94 to 71 bulldozing of the Magic.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

If I may quote myself:

 
Personally, I wouldn't put it past the Celtics to make a late season push if they can get everyone healthy and in rhythm in time for the playoffs. The Pistons and the Spurs of recent years were able to pull that off before age fully caught up with 'em.
 

Ne'emind that late-season push, tho. I meant post-season...  

So much for Jamison putting the Cavs over the top, tho.
 
 
@patiodog,

doc rivers was like a crazy-man standing on a soap-box all season, saying how he believed in this team,
and they would be fine as soon as they got healthy.
no one believed him.
i certainly didn't, not the way they were losing -- especially at home.
turns out he was right...  

add rondo's floor-burn steal/layup to hondo's and bird's on the highlight reel...
 
 
I can't believe how frikkin' jelly-spined the Magic was.
 
 
the cavs are showing coach brown  the door ...
can stan van be far behind?
 
 
@Region Philbis,

The Cavs under Brown have always been painful to watch on offense, even with the best all-around offensive player on the planet. I thought he should have been fired when he was being crowned coach of the year (actually before that) -- or do the Phil Jackson/Rick Adelman thing, and bring in a guru to install an offense.

As for Stan Van ----- I dunno, I've never been able to figure out what sort of team the Magic are, and I'm not sure if that's to do with him or just a weird mix of players. Having played for a shrill little coach in high school, though, I know that a repetitive grating voice like that can turn a team off after a while...
 
 
@patiodog,

Could the 2010 Celtics beat the 1986 Celtics?
Imagine a series that featured Pierce, Garnett, and Allen against Bird, McHale, and Parish.
 http://www.csmonitor.com/Commentary/Editorial-Board-Blog/2010/0527/Could-the-2010-Celtics-beat-the-1986-Celtics 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

not this year's team, but the '08 squad would give 'em a run for their money...
 
 
 

Larry Bird is not walking through that door, fans. Kevin McHale is not
walking through that door, and Robert Parish is not walking through
that door. And if you expect them to walk through that door, they're
going to be gray and old.
 
 
@George,

unfortunately for us it was antoine walker walkin' through that door...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Celts are smothering the Magic.
51 to 32 with less then 4 minutes before the half!
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Magic bring the game to a relative close 13 points at the half.

Then the Celtics rain some 3 pointers to bring the game back up to a 22 point difference!  
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Another 3 by Paul Pierce = 24 point lead!!
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Less then a minute and 15 point inevitable win for the Celtics!!
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Second trip to the NBA Finals in the last 3 years!!
 
 
@tsarstepan,

 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

a very business-like win, C's did not look like they felt any pressure.
orlando ran out of steam just getting to this point.
pierce (31-13-5) had his best game of the year.
lil' nate was huge after rondo hit the deck in the 2nd quarter.
they shot the 3-ball 10-22, each make a mini-dagger...

5 days off is just what the doc ordered...
see ya thursday !
 
 
@Region Philbis,

You need 5 days off, too.  
 
 
@jespah,

these are the nights i won't be getting enough sleep --

2010 NBA Finals Schedule

Game 1: Thu June 3rd at L.A/Pho 9 p.m. EST
Game 2: Sun June 6th at L.A/Pho 8 p.m. EST
Game 3: Tue June 8th at Boston 9 p.m. EST
Game 4: Thu June 10th at Boston 9 p.m. EST
Game 5: Sun June 13th at Boston 8 p.m. EST
Game 6: Tue June 15th at L.A/Pho 9 p.m. EST
Game 7: Thu June 17th at L.A/Pho 9 p.m. EST
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Is there a chance that the Suns can actually pull off the upset against the Lakers?
 
 
@tsarstepan,

they might force a game 7, but i don't see them winning it...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
they might force a game 7, but i don't see them winning it...
 

Sadly, I agree.
 
 
@Ticomaya,

 
 
 
I'm going to go on record predicting Lakers over Suns in 6.
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Oh, I'm rootin' for the Celtics, reej... trust me. Been a Celtics fan since they were beating up on the Lakers in the 80's.
 
 
@Ticomaya,

So far so good. I'm afraid to comment on the present day game in Las Angeles but it's the Celtics up by 12 points with about 5 minutes before the half ends.

They have to keep this intensity and the lead until the game is over. What a great and important win to steal in the LA Staples Center.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

End of the 3rd Quarter. Tied 72 to 72! Come on Celtics!! Knock the Lakers out with a 1 - 2 punch!

They need to start a 10 point or greater run and tire out Kobe.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Under 4 minutes and LA is up by a single point.  

I hate nail biters!
 
 
@tsarstepan,

2:59 on the clock. Timeout from Boston. Boston 91 - LA 90.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Less then 2 minutes:
Boston 95 - LA 90.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

 
  1:12 left,
Boston 97 - LA 90
 
 
@tsarstepan,

33 seconds.
Boston 100 - LA 93!

3 possession game!
 
 
@tsarstepan,

 
I hate nail biters!
 
that was playoff basketball -- both teams competing hard, unlike game one...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

The Celtics came out on the Right side of this nail biter!!  
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Another nail biter!!

Celtics down by a single point with under 10 minutes in the game:
68 to 67. Time out LA.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Under 3 minutes and the Lakers have a 4 point advantage.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

|1:29|
Lakers 84 ~ Celtics 80.
 
 
Today's game is a must win for Boston!
Right now the Celtics are winning 45 to 39 at the half.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

6 minutes left in the game:
Celtics up by 6 points, 81 - 75.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Under 3 minutes remaining and the Celtics double their lead to 12!!
 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Both teams are pitiful on the free throw line!

Celtics up by 8 with 1:39 on the clock.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

46 seconds. 2 possession game. Celtics up by 5 points.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

38 seconds on the clock. Celtics up by 5 points. 20 second time out. Celtics with the possession.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

The Celtics win the pivotal game: 92 to 86. They now lead the NBA Finals 3 games to 2 and the final two games are in LA.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

 
Both teams are pitiful on the free throw line!
 
yeah, that tends to happen in pressure-packed games...
 
 
Bad news, people...
Kendrick Perkins is not suiting up for Game 7. That's a serious shortage of rebounding and height in the paint for the Celts. Now we have to rely on Rasheed Wallace, who can implode emotionally any moment and has a bad back, and Big Baby, who sometimes gets stage fright and over-thinks things.

Not a pretty picture, considering that the Lakers are fired up and playing well right now.

I'll keep my fingers crossed...
 
 
@snood,

yeah, huge blow for the C's.
i wouldn't call it stage fright, though.
baby seems to feed off the pressure of big moments.

i think he'll start, with sheed coming off the bench.
both will have to keep their composure, keep their heads in the game.
scalabrine might get some minutes as well...

should be a good 'un !
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Celtics down by 3 points with less then 30 seconds.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

13 seconds: Lakers up by a pair. Laker's timeout.
 
 
And in another devastating blow to the human personality, it appears that Phil Jackson will get to act like a smug, faux-Buddhist asswipe for another year.
 
 
@Gargamel,

 
 
 
@Gargamel,

 
smug, faux-Buddhist
 

...but you repeat yourself...
 
 
@Gargamel,

 
And in another devastating blow to the human personality, it appears that Phil Jackson will get to act like a smug, faux-Buddhist asswipe for another year.

 

...and we'll have to endure another year of Kobe Bryant being treated like a basketball championship and talent for playing the game is not only just fine as a substitute for, but even better than, any other redeeming qualities as a human being...
 
 
tomorrow the feeding frenzy for free agents (lebron, d-wade, bosh, ect) begins...
 
 
get ready for celtics-lakers XIII next june --
after brief speculation that they'd both be leaving, rivers and jackson have decided to re-up for next season...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
Wednesday June 30, 2010
Basketcase - Stephie's Knicks Hoop-De-Doo Pt. 2
Stephen needs to make one shot against Allan Houston to earn a spot on the New York Knicks team. (06:03)
 

 http://www.colbertnation.com/the-colbert-report-videos/314133/june-30-2010/basketcase---stephie-s-knicks-hoop-de-doo-pt--2 
 
 
lebron will announce his decision on ESPN tomorrow night @ 9pm ET...

 
 
 
I swear, sometimes I think people have just gone batshit crazy en masse. The way we are hyping this announcement you'd think he was about to announce that he'd stopped the Gulf oil leak AND cured cancer.

Lebron James is a gifted athlete. But, I mean, is all this really necessary?
 
 
@snood,

the so-called experts have him staying put in cleveland, where he can get the largest contract.
but if they sign him, they won't have any left to get him a new sidekick or three...
 
 
@snood,

well, at least it's for a good cause...

 
Due to the unprecedented attention and interest surrounding LeBron's decision,
we have decided to make this announcement on national television. By doing so
we have generated funds that will be given to the Boys and Girls Clubs of America.
 
 http://lebronjames.com/ 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

I hear ya, RP. Well, at least that's a good thing...
 
 
 

Let's see...Lb James...Dwayne Wade....Chris Bosch...Mike Miller
Dang!
 
 
@panzade,

Bah!
 
 
@panzade,

does jermaine o have anything left in the tank?
 
 
(emphasis mine)

 
Open Letter to Fans from Cavaliers Majority Owner Dan Gilbert

Dear Cleveland, All Of Northeast Ohio and Cleveland Cavaliers Supporters Wherever You May Be Tonight;

As you now know, our former hero, who grew up in the very region that he deserted this evening, is no longer a Cleveland Cavalier.

This was announced with a several day, narcissistic, self-promotional build-up culminating with a national TV special of his "decision" unlike anything ever "witnessed" in the history of sports and probably the history of entertainment.

Clearly, this is bitterly disappointing to all of us.

The good news is that the ownership team and the rest of the hard-working, loyal, and driven staff over here at your hometown Cavaliers have not betrayed you nor NEVER will betray you.

There is so much more to tell you about the events of the recent past and our more than exciting future. Over the next several days and weeks, we will be communicating much of that to you.

You simply don't deserve this kind of cowardly betrayal.

You have given so much and deserve so much more.

In the meantime, I want to make one statement to you tonight:

"I PERSONALLY GUARANTEE THAT THE CLEVELAND CAVALIERS WILL WIN AN NBA CHAMPIONSHIP
BEFORE THE SELF-TITLED FORMER ‘KING’ WINS ONE"

You can take it to the bank.

If you thought we were motivated before tonight to bring the hardware to Cleveland, I can tell you that this shameful display of selfishness and betrayal by one of our very own has shifted our "motivation" to previously unknown and previously never experienced levels.

Some people think they should go to heaven but NOT have to die to get there.

Sorry, but that's simply not how it works.

This shocking act of disloyalty from our home grown "chosen one" sends the exact opposite lesson of what we would want our children to learn. And "who" we would want them to grow-up to become.

But the good news is that this heartless and callous action can only serve as the antidote to the so-called "curse" on Cleveland, Ohio.

The self-declared former "King" will be taking the "curse" with him down south. And until he does "right" by Cleveland and Ohio, James (and the town where he plays) will unfortunately own this dreaded spell and bad karma.

Just watch.

Sleep well, Cleveland.

Tomorrow is a new and much brighter day....

I PROMISE you that our energy, focus, capital, knowledge and experience will be directed at one thing and one thing only:

DELIVERING YOU the championship you have long deserved and is long overdue....

Dan Gilbert
Majority Owner
Cleveland Cavaliers
 
 http://www.nba.com/cavaliers/news/gilbert_letter_100708.html 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
I PROMISE you that our energy, focus, capital, knowledge and experience will be directed at one thing and one thing only:

DELIVERING YOU the championship you have long deserved and is long overdue....
 

That's funny. Where was that energy, focus, capital, knowledge, and experience as the Cavs lurched through their hideous non-offense for the last three or four years?
 
 
@patiodog,

Uh, but this time we really mean it!

Riiiiight.
 
 
The last time something like this happened, I think it was Chamberlain joining West and Baylor.

The Heat have really gutted their team and will have to be careful to bring the right supporting cast in.

Championships aren't a gimme here.
 
 
@panzade,

When the Lakers drafted Malone and Payton a few years back, they thought it was going to make a championship a gimme. Didn't.
 
 
@snood,

Still, for the purposes of selling out an arena and making big bucks and creating a huge buzz in an already buzzy town; the Heat are gonna bring in a bonanza to S Florida.
I'm already counting my pesos for tickets.
 
 
This is why I love college ball so much.
 
 
@snood,

the heat won't go all the way until the superstars realize that W's are way more important than PPG...

and it goes without saying (but i'll say it anyhoo) --

lebron has hurt his image big-time by making himself public enemy #1 in cleveland...

 
 
 
@LionTamerX,

They're not mutually exclusive.
NBA rips off the fans
NCAA rips off the players.
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Image?
He hurt it way before now
Besides, Image doesn't bring rings...just ask Kobe
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
"If you thought we were motivated before tonight to bring the hardware to Cleveland, I can tell you that this shameful display of selfishness and betrayal by one of our very own has shifted our "motivation" to previously unknown and previously never experienced levels." -- Dan Gilbert
 

What a maroon. It took Labron leaving to fully motivate him to bring a championship to town? Classless hubris.
 
 
@Ticomaya,

Just heard phone-in mook audio clip on SC -- "This proves that LeBron will never be Jordan, he'll never be Bird, he'll never be Magic. He'll never win by himself."

Course, neither did those three, and last I checked, there was no Pippen, or Worthy, or Kareem, or Parish, or Cartwright, or Rodman, or McHale, or even a Michael Cooper or a John Paxson in Cleveland. Kobe was closer to winning them on his own with the Lakers' last couple of titles than any of those guys were -- and he had a great (if obnoxious) coach with a sound offensive philosophy.

If I wanted to win a title, I'd have left Cleveland, too. Probably wouldn't have had my own TV special and all, but sheesh.

LBJ in Chicago would have been more interesting, though.
 
 
@patiodog,

kobe would not have gotten his latest bling without gasol...

agree that chic was a better fit for the king.
perhaps he decided he didn't want thibodeau screaming at him for the next 5 years?
i mean, that man has some pipes !
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Not sure I'd want to play for Reinsdorf either, for that matter. Could've set up a nice Chicago-Miami rivalry, though. No offense, but LA/Boston is getting a little tired.
 
 
journeyman anthony tolliver spoofs the king...

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fvL5KRoXC00 
 
 
 
Shaq plays 'statue' at Harvard Square

Celtics center Shaquille O'Neal decided today is the day he'll spend an hour in Harvard Square as a "statue."
Shaq sent a message to his followers on Twitter that he would be at Harvard Square this afternoon.
 
 (Bahstin Globe) 

 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

When did Shaq happen to Boston? I'm wondering how I missed this news. I can be so oblivious sometimes.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

the C's inked him to a two-year deal in august...
 
 
I saw him last night. Nigel and I went to the pre-season game vs the Nets.
That is one big guy. I think I could put his shoes on over my shoes.

I remarked to Nigel that KG and Shaq together are a daunting sight. He
said "That's a lot of tall. That's enough tall for three people."
 
 
so the C's host the LeBron Heat tomorrow night, then hit the road the next night to play in cleveland.

wondering if the cav fans will give the C's a standing O if they beat the Heat...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

I would love for the rest of the world to see how LeBron is the next Karl Malone. Destined to be a great career player sans the NBA Championship AKA one really overrated player who doesn't deserve all of the hype.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

one could make the argument that both karl and stockton were victims of circumstance --
they lost in the finals two years in a row when da bulls dynasty was at it's peak...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Good point.
 
 
A couple of thoughts...

There are so many teams in the league now that there will probably be ever more hall of fame players who never win a title. Oscar Robertson (a notable James supporter of late) only one once, and that was in a season when the league expanded to (gasp) 17 teams. So I don't know that retiring without a title necessarily equals "overrated." Was Charles Barkley overrated? (Maybe, but I watched the dude in his prime and I don't think so.)

It's become a bit of a cliche to say so, but the James/Jordan comparison doesn't equate. They're very different players -- I watched James a lot during his rookie year (I watched his first game ever against the Kings) and some of his televised high school games, and the role he played with the national team is closer to what I expected of his career than the hold the ball, score the points role he was forced into with the relatively talent-free Cavaliers. The guy's court sense is phenomenal. If you want the Jordanesque killer instinct, carry the team to the title thing, look to Kobe, not LeBron. Again, a cliche, but I think LeBron is lot more like Magic -- capable of carrying a team when necessary, but more effective as a facilitator and integrator of other talents. Of course, now that he's actually playing with other talent, we'll get to see if that's true.

2010-11 could be a very interesting NBA season. Obviously Miami has been the big story, but a lot of teams have new looks, and I'm looking forward to seeing how the rest of the league shakes out.

Oh, and I'll repeat the joke (I think from PTI) that Shaq's statue thing was just him playing pick-and-roll defense....
 
 
@patiodog,

 
... Oh, and I'll repeat the joke (I think from PTI) that Shaq's
statue thing was just him playing pick-and-roll defense....
 

Good one!
I hadn't heard that.
 
 
@George,

Really, really looking forward to Chicago, Phoenix, Portland, OKC...
 
 
I find it funny and telling that in this ESPN poll, even Florida is not rooting for the Miami Heat to win the NBA Championship:
 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

i guess they'd rather see orlando go all the way.
wholesome disney vs riley's evil empire...
 
 
@patiodog,

kobe is to jordan as lebron is to magic --
spot on, p-dawg...
 
 
 
 
 
rondo is on a ridiculous assists-per-game pace to start the season.
he has 82 dimes so far -- good for a 16.4 average...
 
 
I was just looking at the NBA standings so far, and the Knicks are 3-3!

IF THE SEASON WERE TO END RIGHT NOW, THE KNICKS WOULD BE IN THE PLAYOFFS!!!!
 
 
Sorry, I had to say it. It may be my last chance this year to be able to put the words "playoffs" and "the Knicks" in the same sentence.
 
 
@kickycan,

Hah
 
 
@kickycan,

 
Sorry, I had to say it. It may be my last chance this year to be able to put the words "playoffs" and "the Knicks" in the same sentence.

 

Really? How about, "It's only February, and the Knicks are already mathematically eliminated from the playoffs."
 
 
@patiodog,

Go Bucks!
 
 
@patiodog,

millsap (46) & jazz co knocked off the heat...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
millsap (46) & jazz co knocked off the heat...

 

Oh shucky-darn. The terrible trio didn't dominate. Sadness of sadness.
 
 
@snood,

the miracle jazz did likewise to the magic last night.
in back-to-back road games, they overcame deficits of 22 & 18 points.
lest anyone think that's easy to do... it's not.

C's-Heat II tonight...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
the miracle jazz did likewise to the magic last night.
in back-to-back road games, they overcame deficits of 22 & 18 points.
lest anyone think that's easy to do... it's not.

C's-Heat II tonight...

 

Yup! Want to see that one!!
 
 
@snood,

Half-watching, not much of a contest. (A lot closer if Allen shoots like a normal human, though.)

Wondering, though, what the big deal about Bosh is? I'd never been impressed with him before this season, but I hadn't really seen him play, so I figured I was just missing something -- but he just seems to me like a skinny 6'10" jump shooter, the kind of guy opposing teams let shoot on a bad team because it's worth it to keep him off the boards.

Also wondering -- is this Miami "Big Three" supposed to be better than, or even comparable to, the '80s big 3s of Magic/Kareem/Worthy or Bird/McHale/Parish?

Oh, and now the lead's shrunk. Back to game...
 
 
@patiodog,

Hahahahahaaaaaa! The "Big Three" indeed! LeBron is looking WEAK!!!

but 48 seconds left...
 
 
Damn! 3 point game with 13 seconds!!
 
 
@snood,

miami made a nice comeback attempt, but had dug themselves too big a hole to climb out of.
it looked like LBJ was getting the benefit of the doubt with the officials down the stretch.
the C's played an awesome team game, something miami hasn't figured out yet.

this was a tone-setter !
Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vOPMEYvPcRA 

 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

It's official, honey. I love Rajon Rondo.
 
 
@jespah,

he is the frickin' MAN...
 
 
@jespah,

16 assists last night and a 14.9 assist average! Rondo is a GOD!
 
 
@Region Philbis,

RAWN - doh!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
 
 
@snood,

 
It's been a pleasure to bring my talents to south beach now on to Memphis!
 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
 
It's been a pleasure to bring my talents to south beach now on to Memphis!
 

 

I was willing to let the jury stay out about leBron, even though I got bad vibes from him every time I saw him. But the last several months - this whole move to Miami; his public persona - I've got him pegged as pretty much a shallow-ass legend in his own mind.
 
 
I've started to follow this thread again, on the premise that I might drag up an earlier interest in basketball from the depths of my brain. First I have to learn which teams are from which cities (only half kidding). Anyway, y'all have a reader.
 
 
@snood,

i think lebron had a panic attack after being eliminated from the playoffs this year.
he still needs a handful of rings to 'cement his legacy' and fulfill his plan to join jordan and kobe up there in the rarified air.

as for the heat, it looks like spoelstra's days are numbered.
riley will soon resume full control, and try to develop some chemistry.
he's done it before.
one thing's certain -- they desparately need a shot-blocking center...
 
 
@ossobuco,

it's a great sport to watch if you are following a specific team that plays well.
i lost interest as i was transitioning my loyalty from a no-longer good knicks team to a pretty bad celtics team.
now that they're playing great basketball again, i'm all in...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Hehehe! They STILL need another star player! That's gotta crack me up!

Celts handed them another loss...in their OWN ARENA, no less! Can't quite fit them for the Championship rings yet, eh King James?

Rondo...is again showing his superstar status to the tune of 16 assists per game? It's not the stats, though - it's the way he plays. Those passes - artistic! He's worth the price of admission alone.
 
 
@Ragman,

rondo, at age 24, is in charge of distributing the ball to four HOF'ers... how cool is that?
 
 
minnesota PF kevin love had a 31 point/31 rebound   night against the knicks last night.
to find the last 30-30, you'd have to go allllll the way back to moses malone (circa 1982)...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

I saw that report on ESPN. Could this be a future star or a guy with an incredibly hot hand?
 
 
@Ragman,

he's been a double-double machine for 2+ seasons.
it remains to be seen whether it was a fluke or not...
 
 
quote of the night, courtesy of kevin garnett...

“Shaq is like a paradise, man. You ever wash your sheets and then when you go out,
you hang them out and when the sun dries them you smell your sheets?
That’s what Shaq is.’’
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Not quite sure what he means. Sounds like a busted analogy?

I'm sure that having a Shaq-like presence on your team takes the rebounding onus and grunt-work off of him. Might give him and them another 2 yrs of top-tier NBA shelf life (if they both make it).
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Did you know that Love's father Stan Love is the brother of Beach Boys' singer Mike Love?
 
 
@Ragman,

yes, i recall reading that when he first came into the league...

trouble on the beach --
the heat's haslem (foot) might be done for the year.
riley will need to shop for a new enforcer...
 
 
I have been enjoying the small amount of time I get watching the high flying show of Blake Griffin. But, the Clips don't get much TV time in these parts. My team is OKC Thunder w/number 1 point maker Kevin Durant. This team is the most improved over the last 3 years! Hope they become very competitive soon.
 
 
@BillW,

hey there, BillW !

the C's made the mistake of taking the durant-less OKC lightly last week, and paid for it.
looks like they will be battling utah for the NW division crown...

last night shaq had a throwback game -- 25/11 in 32 minutes.
it's been 3 years since a 38-year old (sam cassel) scored that many in a game...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Hey back attach  

Shaq continues to amaze - thought he was gone 6 years ago. How does any obect have enough to move that much mass around? Of course, you've got to keep him motivated or his minutes will go down, down, down..........

My prayers are for Blake to come to OKC - but, at what cost, yipes!
 
 
@BillW,

it would be foolish for the clippers to part with griffin before his rookie contract is up,
but they've got a history of making bizarre moves...

the big shamrock seems to be cool with fewer minutes.
most nights he won't be called upon to carry the offensive load.
they need him to rebound and (flagrantly) foul anyone brave enough to drive the lane...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

I have to say that I haven't seen him this inspired since his early Heat days.
 
 
@BillW,

he has regained that hop in his step, and is having fun out there on the hardwood again...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Didn't Shaq just have another highlight film game? I saw him running - not walking - the floor to the basket.
 
 
@Ragman,

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_CE4dxztXAo 

 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

I thought the roof was gonna cave in! If he had not of caught onto the rim, and it held - there would have been a rather large hole in the floor.......
 
 
@BillW,

It truly amazes me to see him run and jump. That's like lifting a crane!
 
 
@Ragman,

Don't you mean, ".........a crane lifting itself."?  
 
 
@BillW,

i believe they were forced to do a league-wide reinforcement of the basket bases after he pulled one over on them a few years back...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9_zXjuebDXo 

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mFME30bB7ok 
 
 
@BillW,

that was the night danny ainge said to himself, "if i ever get to be GM, omma sign that guy..."
 
 
tonight lebron "quitness" james makes his return to the forlorn city he ceremoniously dumped.

the heat went so far as to keep their travel plans under wrap... and now this --

 
[cav's owner] Gilbert has paid hundreds of thousands of dollars to a Midwestern law firm to investigate
suspicions that the Heat broke NBA tampering rules
 
 (espn) 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

It's a beatdown at the half.

Frankly, I think Gilbert comes off too easy in this whole thing. Except for drafting James, the team has not been well-run.

Very cool that a few weeks into the season the league still looks wide open. It's a shame I'll be cancelling the cable next week (for that reason only).
 
 
@patiodog,

yeah, they look lottery-bound this year.
loved how they played the star wars evil empire theme during intros, and forced miami to wear there white uni's.
big Z got a nice ovation, as expected.
 
 
@patiodog,

 
 
Sorry, I had to say it. It may be my last chance this year to be able to put the words "playoffs" and "the Knicks" in the same sentence.

 

Really? How about, "It's only February, and the Knicks are already mathematically eliminated from the playoffs."

 

Or how about, "I know it's only December, but the Knicks are looking a lot like a playoff team right now."

I just watched a Knicks game and yelled out in jubilation as they pulled out a great win.

I don't think I've said those words in ten years. Let me relish the moment for a second.

...

The Knicks are back, baby! They are 11-1 over the last 12 games, and Stoudemire has been unstoppable, with six 30+ point games in a row, blocked shots, big points in the 4th quarter...the guy is gettin' the job DONE. And they have a point guard all of a sudden, and they also have a couple other guys who can score. The offense is clickin'.

Okay, it's early in the season, I realize that. But it's been so long since I've had anything to be excited about with this freaking team!

Dare I say it aloud? Is it too early?

The Knicks are good! Oh my god, I said it! And it felt goooooood....ha, ha bring on big baby James and the Heat!
 
 
@kickycan,

yeah, what's gotten into them?
 
 
I haven't even looked at bball for a few weeks. Need to at least review where my teams are at. I know my college team is going no where, but need to at least get in mind where the Thunder are at and what Blake has been doing for me lately.
 
 
@kickycan,

Damn. The Knicks. Who new?
 
 
What's gonna happen to the Hornets - for that matter what's gonna happen to the entire league next year. Heard tonight the NBA is gonna lose $350 million this year and are requesting that every player take a 33% cut in pay. What is the chance of this happening?
 
 
@BillW,

they are heading for a lock-out next year, hopefully a short one...

meanwhile, the C's became the first team in NBA history to start 16-4 four straight seasons.
thank U, big 3 !
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Wait, wait! That's The Big 4. Gotta include Rondo, natch!
 
 
@Ragman,

true.
with the big shamrock on board, it's actually the big 5 this year (but who's counting?)...
didn't need shaq tonight -- blew out charlotte 93-62...
10 straight W's !
 
 
@kickycan,

Kicky, I would have PMd this, but seeing as it is not working, I shall just stick this on your latest post and hope that you pick it up.
I know you enjoyed the Brit version of the Office, so I'm pretty sure that you have a warped enough sense of humour to enjoy this as well.
A recent discovery of mine...

Warning: Adult language. Over 18's only.
 http://www.youtube.com/verify_age?next_url=http%3A//www.youtube.com/watch%3Fv%3Dt0dqfDD8g-4%26list%3DSL 

Give it about five minutes to get used to the format, and hopefully you will find it right up your street. There are many more episodes - just search " Pete versus life "

Hope you get this, and sorry for the minor derailment everyone.

Carry on....
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Oops...my oversight! Shaq-ém attack. Be still my Shaqy-breaky heart!

62 points, in deed! What a poor showing.
 
 
@Ragman,

tomorrow night we shall see how far the knicks have really come.
with 4 days off the C's should be rested and ready, hopefully not rusty...
 
 
wow that was a good 'un, right down to the wire.
knicks look like they've turned the corner on their decade of mediocrity.

tommy heinsohn said it best --
"that's as good as the knicks can play, but not as good as the celtics can play"...

they need a shaq-like enforcer to patrol the paint, so they don't have to play
run n' gun all night in an effort to outscore the other team.
the C's got way too many easy lay-ups...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Nice to see Knicks are back in the running again. It's good for the league. Stoudamire has a team around him. And may Spike Lee choke on his bile!
 
 
Interesting evening with lots of good scores, with exception of course, to the hated Lakers. My Thunder performed well to the powerless Rockets. Anyone know, is Yao out forever? Rockets were "my team" before the advent of the Thunder.....
 
 
@BillW,

Wiki info excerpt on Yao:

"In July 2009, Yao discussed the (foot-toe) injury with his doctors, and the Rockets applied for a disabled player exception, an exception to the NBA Salary Cap which grants the injured player's team money to sign a free agent.[94] The Rockets were granted the exception, and used approximately $5.7 million on free agent Trevor Ariza. After weeks of consulting, it was decided that Yao would undergo surgery in order to repair the broken bone in his left foot.[95] He did not play the entire 2009–10 season.[96]

For the 2010–11 season, the Rockets will limit Yao to no more than 24 minutes a game, with no plan to play him on back-to-back nights. The goal is to keep Yao healthy long term."
 
 
@BillW,

I looked up his stats: so far this season he's been in 5 games and averaged 18 mins / game.
 
 
@Ragman,

Thanks Ragman. I do believe I remember that this condition is a big man problem and will haunt him for the rest of his career.
 
 
@Ragman,

 
Stoudamire has a team around him....
 

I hope by this comment, RM, you are not implying that he did not have a team around him last year.
 
 
@Ticomaya,

i think he was comparing them to last year's knicks "team" -- if you could call it that...
 
 
@Ticomaya,

Relative to last year's team, this team is superior. Don't you think? Results (as well as an eyeball test) seem(s) to indicate they are.
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
i think he was comparing them to last year's knicks "team" -- if you could call it that...

 

Ah, gotcha. I'll buy that.
 
 
@Ragman,

 
Relative to last year's team, this team is superior. Don't you think? Results (as well as an eyeball test) seem(s) to indicate they are.
 

I honestly couldn't say. I do wish Amare was still a Sun playing this well.
 
 
@BillW,

Yao Ming out indefinitely with stress fracture in his left ankle
 http://sports.espn.go.com/nba/news/story?id=5926989 
 
 
they've upgraded it to out for the season now for yao.
ow...
 http://sports.espn.go.com/nba/news/story?id=5931199 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Two seasons in a row for Yao - I remember reading somewhere last year that one scenario for Yao was his problems are career ending.
 
 
some big trades were made today --

 
The Orlando Magic capped a blockbuster day of wheeling and dealing by trading one franchise cornerstone
for another, sending Rashard Lewis to the Washington Wizards for Gilbert Arenas on Saturday.

That trade followed news of a deal that sent Vince Carter to the Phoenix Suns in a six-player swap that
returns Hedo Turkoglu to the Magic.

The Magic also get Jason Richardson and Earl Clark from the Suns in exchange for Carter, Marcin Gortat,
Mickael Pietrus, a 2011 first-round pick and cash considerations.
 
 (espn) 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

I heard that Turkoglu has played his best ball w/Howard, and Howard loves playing w/him. Also, Hedo works best in the Magic system. Could this be the one piece to take Orlando to the next level?
 
 
@BillW,

Well, Hedo wasn't doing anything here in Phx, that's for sure. Hate to lose J-Rich, though.
 
 
@Ticomaya,

i can understand phx wanting to shake things up, but orl is 16-10.
this might be a step back for them...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

The Magic have recent history of being very successful in regular season but need a much better "tournment" team for post season. As I said before, Hedo's most career success has been in his earlier stay with Dwight and Magic. This could be a very good trade for Magic. Howard needs help down low to get triple teams off him.

Time will tell and - and, if it doesn't work, there maybe time this year to make more trades to get it right. With the Knicks on the prowl now, the east is becoming more interesting.
 
 
@BillW,

lucky 13 for the C's.
with rondo nursing a hammy, pierce has been playing some point forward and had a trip-dub today...
 
 
I'm thinking the Suns really wanted Gortat -- he's been a very strong inside presence when he's had playing time (at least in past years; haven't seen him play this season). Pietrus should also be able to work well off of Nash. And in return for that they get to eat Vince Carter's contract.

No TV now, though, so b-ball and I are going to be drifting apart. So ----- Go Bucks!
 
 
@patiodog,

That's what the local sports hacks are saying. It will be nice to have another legitimate big man. That and they were able to unload Hedo's contract, which could have become an issue with cap space in the future. Pietrus should give the Suns another defensive wing player, to help spell Grant Hill. We'll see.
 
 
@Ticomaya,

Pietrus didn't play much D for the magic -- he was more of an assassin off the bench, especially in the playoffs.

Gortat is a better-than-average big off the bench...
 
 
and, so goes the game of roundball - big moves happen after Super Bowl....Then is when I start watching, cause then is when the real games start being televised. Actually, about 2 weeks before taking up college football time and fewer NFL games.

Golf tomorrow - hoping Artie stays home - long drive, going about 145 miles to warm weather.
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Suns could use a better-than-average big, off the bench or not.
 
 
Shaq Shows He Can Still Dominate Around Basket...
 http://tinyurl.com/2a8uo67 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

... looks like 5 Guys on that team...
 
 
@Ticomaya,

I would agree with the distinctive red and white tile pattern.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PoyiR3ob7yk 
 
 
College - I know - But, my OU Soones are currently tied with Central Arkansas with 4 minutes left in the game. How low can they go - damn.......Ok, up by 3 now with 3:30 left.......Can we beat Maryland Eastern Shore Monday, they are just 3-9.....?
 
 
33 seconds left - OU at the line w/3 point lead - made 1, 2 possession game.
 
 
@BillW,

against powerhouse Central Arkansas.

at home...

Mizzou had trouble with them, too...
 http://rivals.yahoo.com/ncaa/basketball/recap?gid=201012180367 

...not.
 
 
@Rockhead,

We've already lost against Division II Chaminade. Looks like we will be 0 for the Big 12......did win this one though <sigh>
 
 
@BillW,

I can't pretend to be sad...

I take in a game in Lawrence once in a while.
 
 
@Rockhead,

Coach Capel had to replace 9 scholarships for this year - that hurts big time, but, Chaminade - oh well, bigger story UConn women are losing to Stanford by 11 points with 9:30 left.......
 
 
@BillW,

It's over UConn lost 71-59 to Stanford - the same team that last beat them 91 games ago!
 
 
@BillW,

Well the loss was inevitable. Now I bet the pressure is slightly less (allegedly) on the Huskies. Now it's double-time down the long road to the Final Four and beyond in March.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

They are certainly the team to beat. For some of those players, it is the first time they have lost in college, and probably won't again! I do love the irony of sports though, who started and stopped the UCLA streak? Notre Dame........
 
 
@Ragman,

 
I saw that report on ESPN. Could this be a future star or a guy with an incredibly hot hand?
 
watched him grab 24 boards against the C's the other night -- he is the real deal...

miami has settled down and have found a winning formula...

knicks spanked the spurs last night.
hopefully the spurs will be more tired than mad when they play the C's tonight...
 
 
great game between 2 heavy-weights.

rondo had another one of those sick trip-dubs:
12 pts, 22 dimes, 10 boards, 6 steals, 1 block...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Arrgh! I HATE that my dang tv service doesn't televise a lot of games!! Sounds like it was a goodn'.
 
 
@snood,

the game wasn't on last night??
that's outrageous...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

I think the area I live is the reason the market better supports NASCAR and bass fishing.
 
 
I need to figure out a good place on the net to watch b-ball. KU games aren't broadcast here locally, so I only get to see them if ESPN is showing the game.

Suns v. Knicks tonight... Amar'e's triumphant return.
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Rondo's effect on the Celts game is akin to what Bob Cousy was. Only he's a better quicker-off-the-line 'modern athlete'. Agreed?
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Duely noted. I guess you can say, he's now gettin' 'the 'love' form the sports media, eh?
 
 
@Ragman,

 
Rondo's effect on the Celts game is akin to what Bob Cousy was. Only he's a better quicker-off-the-line 'modern athlete'. Agreed?
 
they won't go far in the playoffs without him, that's fer shirr...

 
Duely noted. I guess you can say, he's now gettin' 'the 'love' form the sports media, eh?
 
he would be an instant crowd favorite up heeyuh, quickly rocketing to Bird-like status...
 
 
check out this line score from last night --

Code: 1 2 3 4 T
CLE 12 13 16 16 57
LAL 27 30 35 20 112

 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

wow. like, just, wow.
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Wow, if this becomes a trend against Cleveland, maybe it would still mean not much.

But I'm also surprised that Cleveland allowed one of it's junior high team play on a school night.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

LeDarth's follow-up tweet after seeing the cavs box score...

"Crazy. Karma is a b****. Gets you every time. It's not good to wish bad on anybody. God sees everything!"

 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
LeDarth's follow-up tweet after seeing the cavs box score...

"Crazy. Karma is a b****. Gets you every time. It's not good to wish bad on anybody. God sees everything!"

 

 

Yup, and if pride (and arrogance and snotty prima donna self-centered smallness) comes before a fall, you got a big one coming your way, Mr "Karma is a b****".
 
 
@snood,

exactly.
miami won the other night because their "big 3" scored 96 of the team's 107 points.
that's all well and good during the season, but come playoffs they will need more than 3 scorers if they want to advance to the 2nd round...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

S Florida sports writers agree with you reeg.
Headline this morning:"Easy Wins Not Helping Heat's Growth"

 
 
 
@panzade,

speaking of karma, lebron is day-to-day after spraining his ankle last night...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Jeez...can't someone in his circle tell King James that he should leave the shots at Cleveland behind. Makes the big man look small -- like the petulant child, which he is.
 
 
"James questionable for Thursday with ankle sprain"

karma...?

(sorry reeg. i should read first.   you get up mighty early, however)
 
 
@Rockhead,

(it's that dang roostah next door...)
 
 
@BillW,

 
I have been enjoying the small amount of time I get watching the high flying show of Blake Griffin.
 
he dropped 47/14 on the pacers, a day after they clipped the lakers @ staples...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

It was also his 27th straight double-double. I saw the game, his total game is fun to watch. He is also very cool on the floor. He calmed Jordan down a few times - he is a big time leader.
 
 
The Celts looked good against Orlando tonight. Paul Pierce and Ray Allen are still deadly when on. Rondo's passing phenomenal; KG was fired up, and Shaq and the others like Big Baby definitely played a part.

R-A-W-N --- D-O-HHHHHHH!!!!!
 
 
@snood,

yeah, we shot 60% last night.
lotsa lay-ups and high %age shots.
orlando kept draining 3's, keeping it close.
we needed KG's energy to get over the hump.
ray is closing in on reggie miller's 3-point record.
perkins is due back in a few weeks, as is delonte after the break...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Just watched the highlight of Griffin's performance against Indy. For a guy his size, he's a monster around the bucket -- like a leaner, quicker Charles Barkley. He had a spin move coming down the lane to get to a righty lay-up that was ridiculous.

Of course, the Round Mound of Sit-Down had the long-range game going by the middle of his career, as well...
 
 
@patiodog,

he's out to prove people wrong who say he's nothing but a dunk machine.
looking forward to watching him play the C's next month...
 
 
@patiodog,

 
He had a spin move coming down the lane to get to a righty lay-up that was ridiculous.
 

Did you notice he started that move by a dribble between the legs - Barkley didn't have that kind of dribbling ability. Blake also has a midrange shot. He had a couple of 6-8 foot no look twister, jump shots in that game.
 
 
About 12 games until the All-Star game on February 20th. What should the league do to make it count? Should the do what the MLB did and give homecourt advantage to the winning conference? Something else?
 
 
@tsarstepan,

MLB did it to draw more interest (ie. ratings).
don't think the NBA has an issue with lack of fan interest for the all-star game...
 
 
@BillW,

 
 
He had a spin move coming down the lane to get to a righty lay-up that was ridiculous.
 

Did you notice he started that move by a dribble between the legs - Barkley didn't have that kind of dribbling ability. Blake also has a midrange shot. He had a couple of 6-8 foot no look twister, jump shots in that game.

 

I came around slowly to being a Blake 'believer'. In the back of my mind, I admit I was thinking he was just a pet sort of 'favorite character' or something for people that didn't know jack about basketball. But that young man has got a special talent, and if he has work ethic, should be providing ooohs and ahhhs for several years. His speed, strength, leaping ability and savvy make me shake my head and go "Damn!" just about every time I've seen him.
 
 
@snood,

I've been watching him for about 5 years now. It will be interesting to see how he matures. A lot of the stuff he does now can't be done in 5-6 more years. Ask Kobie!
 
 
@BillW,

 
I've been watching him for about 5 years now. It will be interesting to see how he matures. A lot of the stuff he does now can't be done in 5-6 more years. Ask Kobie!

 

Yeah, that's true. I saw that whole thing play out with Jordan. Watched him from freshman year with UNC all the way through the debacle year with the Wizards. Jordan developed a deadly fall away jumper with a high arc that was nearly as unstoppable as his slash through the lane had been. Kobe's having a little harder time transitioning, I think. I think LeBum will have an even harder time. Blake? time will tell...
 
 
@snood,

I saw Blake highlights for the first time Saturday; Awesome!

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tE8d35l_YXM 
 
 
C's turned a close game into a laugher down the stretch, shooting 60% against a disinterested laker squad.

pretty amazing turnaround after managing only 71 against phoenix friday night...
 
 
@panzade,

 
I saw Blake highlights for the first time Saturday; Awesome!
 

I'm afraid he's going to seriously injure himself on the rim one of these days.

 
C's turned a close game into a laugher down the stretch, shooting 60% against a disinterested laker squad.

pretty amazing turnaround after managing only 71 against phoenix friday night...
 

And us Suns fans appreciated that effort on Friday!

Speaking of Suns games and the potential for injury on the rim, did you see this during a 3rd quarter break during the game against Charlotte last week? Suns Gorilla Verve Sol Patrol member, Nick Corrales dunks himself:

Youtube:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MIwWDF6nvVE 
 
 
@Ticomaya,

 
Nick Corrales dunks himself
 
wowwwww... do you get extra points for that?
 
 
in an otherwise slow sportsnews day, defending 3 -pt contest champ paul pierce has challenged teammate ray allen to a duel on all-stah weekend.

ray is closing in on reggie miller's all-time record of 3 's made -- he only needs 8 to tie...
 
 
The Bucks lost to the Suns last night. Why is this notable?

 "Milwaukee lost its 23rd straight game to the Suns in Phoenix, a streak that dates to 1987..." 
 
 
@Ticomaya,

it's always so odd when a franchise's domination over another stretches out over generations like that.

chances are good that there's no one left on either side from that first loss 24 years ago...
 
 
ray allen discussing what it takes to be a great shooter...

 
“It’s so much more than what someone gives you. It takes so much more in this league to be great. It’s sort of like a love-hate relationship because you love it, but you hate it at the same time because you have to commit to it. You can’t be in two different places at once. You can’t try to do too much, and be social and live this glamorous life.

“If you want to be great you have to devote yourself and commit yourself to this job. Getting the rest at nighttime, eating right and avoiding the temptations that go on (while) on the road or whatever. This is a 365-day-a-year job, and when you commit to it, it pays you back. I know that whatever I chose to do I would have been great at it, because of my ability to commit.”
 
 (herald) 
 
 
sad ending to coach sloan's 23-year career in utah.
deron williams Q-rating just went way down...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Celtics v Heat on one channel, Bruins v Red Wings on another.
My remote is overheating.
 
 
@George,

Celtics news regarding Shaq!
 http://tinyurl.com/6dsaf7p 
 
 
@George,

if you told me pierce was gonna score one measly pernt on 0-10 shooting,
i woulda told you there was no way in heck the C's were gonna beat miama...  
 
 
@Region Philbis,

More late breaking basketball news:
 http://bit.ly/elwuPt 
 
 
Your boy Griffin is getting ready to participate in the dunk contest in a few minutes...
 
 
@snood,

if the clippers knew he was gonna jump over the hood of a car, i bet they would've forbade him from doing it.
he already lost a year to injury.
thankfully he didn't blow out his knee again...
 
 
 
sad ending to coach sloan's 23-year career in utah.
deron williams Q-rating just went way down...
 
 Williams traded to Nets 

 
The Nets will send Derrick Favors and Devin Harris to Utah for the All-Star point guard. The Jazz will also get
two first-round draft picks from the Nets, according to multiple media reports.
 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 http://sports.yahoo.com/nba/blog/ball_dont_lie/post/The-Celtics-stun-the-NBA-with-a-pair-of-deals?urn=nba-325990 

Wow, I thought the Knicks trading half their team for Carmello Anthony was a questionable move, but this seems even worse.

Good! Go Magic!
 
 
@kickycan,

Yeah, it's a head-scratcher.
 
 
@George,

my initial reaction was the trade made no sense.
apparently ainge thought perk was gonna test the free agent waters this summer, so he went out and got something for him now
instead of losing him for nothing later.
they really emptied the bench, dumping all the scrubs...

so it all comes down to shaq now.
if he gets (and stays) healthy for the playoffs, they're golden.
otherwise it could be a fast playoff exit...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Not sure that even a healthy Shaq gives you more than 30-35 good minutes a game in the playoffs at this point. He hasn't exactly been avoiding foul trouble in recent years.

That's cool, though. I've still got a soft spot for Hedo.
 
 
@patiodog,

two benefits of having a healthy shaq:
his ability to draw double (sometimes triple) teams -- which frees up the big 4 to do their respective things, and his intimidating presence on D.
he doesn't have to score a point as long as he rebounds and clogs the middle.
when healthy, he was also the beneficiary of many rondo lobs this year...
 
 
K-Love had another monster game -- 37 pts, 23 boards -- his 4 th 30-20 of the year.
Pau Gasol has the only other one this season...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

K-Love wants that rebound more than anyone else on the court.
 
 
I've always liked Amare Stoudemire; never been very fond of 'Melo, but I will cheer for ANYONE who beats the Heat! Go Knicks!
 
 
@Ticomaya,

the want plus the know-how makes him a veritable rebounding machine...
 
 
Love is young, so he may end up being the greatest rebounder. but he ain't there yet. Below is listed highest rebounds in a game, but the list for average per game in history is still a long climb, too.

Most Rebounds in a Game in NBA History by a Player

1. Wilt Chamberlain - 55

On November 24, 1960 Wilt Chamberlain of the Philadelphia Warriors grabbed 55 rebounds vs the Boston Celtics. That is the most ever in an NBA game and a record that will be tough to beat.

2. Bill Russell - 51

On February 5, 1960 Bill Russell of the Boston Celtics grabbed 51 rebounds against the Syracuse Nationals. Russell and Chamberlain are the only two players to ever grab 50 plus rebounds in a game.

Most Rebounds in an NBA Game by Player Since 1986-87

1. Charles Oakley - 35

Charles Oakley was a great rebounder and he grabbed 35 boards for the Chicago Bulls on April 22, 1988.

2. Rony Seikaly - 34

Rony Seikaly played college ball for my team the Syracuse Orangemen. He went on to have a pretty good NBA career averaging 14.7 points and 9.5 rebounds per game and on March 3, 1993 he grabbed 34 rebounds for the Miami Heat. Seikaly finished up his 11 year NBA career for the New Jersey Nets but he was shot as a player by then.

2. Dennis Rodman - 34

Dennis Rodman was one of the best rebounders in NBA history and on March 4, 1992 he grabbed 34 boards for the Detroit Pistons.

4. Charles Barkley - 33

The Round Mound of Rebound was an outstanding rebounder and on November 2, 1996 he grabbed 33 for the Houston Rockets.

4. Kevin Willis - 33

On February 19, 1992 Kevin Willis of the Atlanta Hawks grabbed 33 boards.

6. Dennis Rodman - 32 on January 2, 1994 for San Antonio Spurs

6. Dennis Rodman - 32 on January 28, 1992 for Pistons again

8. Kevin Love(notes) - 31 on November 12, 2010 for Minnesota Timberwolves

Love currently leads the NBA in rebounds for the 2010-11 season.

8. Kevin Willis - 31 on December 3, 1991 for Hawks

8. Dennis Rodman - 31 on March 14, 1992 for Pistons again

8. Dikembe Mutombo(notes) - 31 on March 26, 1996 for Denver Nuggets
 
 
@snood,

 
Rony Seikaly played college ball for my team the Syracuse Orangemen.
 

Safe to assume you don't like Melo because he only stayed 1 year?

I don't like Melo because he beat KU that year.

(I think Seikaly was on my fantasy basketball team that year he got the 34 rebounds.)
 
 
@Ticomaya,

Sorry Tico, I cut and pasted that article of statistics, and didn't even take notice that there was some editorial commentary in it. It isn't my comment.
Here's a link to the original article...

 http://bleacherreport.com/articles/37430-battle-of-the-boards-who-are-the-nbas-best-rebounders-of-all-time 
 
 
@snood,

i would just like to take this moment to publicly thank the Spurs for the beat-down they administered to the Heat the other night...  
 
 
@Region Philbis,

I hear ya. I will piggy-back on that by expressing my deep gratitude to the Carolina Tarheels for putting the beatdown on the Dookies.
 
 
one more double-double and K.Love breaks M.Malone's 32-year old record of 51 straight games (which he did over the course of 2 seasons)...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

He's on my fantasy basketball team this year, and I appreciate his efforts!
 
 
@Ticomaya,

DO YOU REALLY BELIEVE IN BASKETBALL??!!

Join us for this year's March Madness tourney! Be there or be... a flat and deflated basketball!
 http://able2know.org/topic/169275-1 
 
 
@tsarstepan,

TARHEELS, Baby!!!!!!!!!
 
 
@snood,

Duke's winning this year.  
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Maybe, maybe not. Whatever, it won't affect the fact that I love CAROLINA and hate DOOK!
 
 
C's stole won from NYK last night...  
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
C's stole won from NYK last night...  

 

I can't get over how stupid it was to trade K. Perkins. the C's are gonna have a hard road with 'O'neal Lite' and Big Baby as their frontcourt anchors.
 
 
@snood,

yup.
barring a shaq medical miracle, they won't get past the next round...
 
 
bahn-burhnah at the gahden tonight.
C's won by 3, thanx to rondo's career-high 30 and KG's veteran guile at the end.
knicks hung around all night, despite injuries to billups and stoudemire...
 
 
C's destroyed NYK last night --

pierce: 38 pts (6-8 in 3's)
allen: 32 pts (8-11 in 3's)
rondo: 15-11- 20* trip-dubb

* celtic playoff record; 1st player to have a playoff trip-dubb with 20 dimes in 20 years (magic johnson)...

 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

That was take-no-prisoners basketball.
 
 
@George,

they kept a foot on the throat the entire game, something we haven't seen much of since the perkins trade...
 
 
 

how sweep it is...  
 
 
Man!! When "The Truth" is on like he was last night, I'll still put him up against anyone as a finisher! They look very focused, and that's encouraging. As long as they're meshing and flowing like that, I'd almost rather Shaq just stay in his suit on the bench.
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Rondo = True Celtic heart.
Garnett= ditto
Allen - ditto
Pierce = ditto
Davis = ditto (off the bench)

Kevin Garnett had 26 points and 10 rebounds, Rajon Rondo added 21 points and 12 assists,

Wow! Green tossed is some very timely points, too.
It's contagious.

In this next series I'd love to see a reasonably healthy Shaq come off the bench and be effective for 10 mins per game. Or even the other O'Neal with his blocked shot ability.
 
 
i'll take either o'neal in the pivot -- their games are pretty much the same.
shaq gets another week to heal up...
 
 
Heat up next? Should be entertaining
 
 
@panzade,

 
Heat up next? Should be entertaining

 

For REAL for real.....
 
 
@snood,

... go sixers !
 
 
@Region Philbis,

BWAAAA CKK

 
 
 
@panzade,

oh no -- i want us to play the heat... just not 'til philly beats them up s'more...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

gotya!
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
oh no -- i want us to play the heat... just not 'til philly beats them up s'more...

 

Exactly. If the sixers run some of the bounce out of them younger legs, it might make the C's job a little more do-able.
 
 
@snood,

IMO this is Spoelstra's first critical game.
 
 
@panzade,

 
IMO this is Spoelstra's first critical game.

 

Why, is he suiting up?  
 
 
@snood,

Isn't he younger than Shaq?  
 
 
@panzade,

Yeah, but he looks more suited to play polo than basketball.
 
 
@snood,

thought so too, but he  actually had game  back in college...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
thought so too, but he  actually had game  back in college...

 

Whatever. The sooner him and "The King" crash and burn, the better, far as I'm concerned. I have a real dislike for LeBighead and the Heat. Almost wish D-Wade played for someone else - he's the only one I like.
 
 
@snood,

round one sunday afternoon...
 
 
@snood,

I feel ya. But I'm stuck with rooting for the Heat. They're sorta like the Gorgeous George team of the NBA. Roundly hated but they sell tickets.
 
 
@panzade,

dunno what pierce was thinking there in the 4th quarter...  
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Perhaps he was tired of getting slammed around? However, be that as it may, he surely didn't help his team out by getting tossed.

Methinks these hard fouls are going to boil over again. Maybe the ref thought he was trying to keep a lid on it?. Not so sure doing that will stop it.
 
 
@Ragman,

word is...Pierce was tossed for a verbal taunt.  
But a 12 year vet and captain should know better.
 
 
@panzade,

yup...

[sour] ref still shoulda swallowed his whistle [grapes]
 
 
@panzade,

Not exactly JUST that as that face rub with his opponent was the first incident. Then came the verbal taunt of the ref which contributed to the Technical. It was both of those 2 events that got him tossed.
 
 
The Celtics are really banged up. And the Heat are coming together at just the right time.
 
 
@panzade,

Heat can outrun 'em. Hard to keep up when the biggies are sucking wind.
 
 
@Ragman,

even if we take care a bidness @ home, we still gotta figure out a way to win down south.
not lookin' good for B-18...
 
 
tonight's game plan --

• o'neals take no prisoners in the paint
• get wade & james in foul-trouble
• feed off the crowd energy
 
 
Folks. It's a whole new series. The Celtics done woke up.
 
 
@panzade,

i thought it was all over when rondo's elbow popped out...
how tough is he??!!
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Now, that man is the energizer bunny. What I liked was what he did energy-wise for his team by doing it. He played with it. I swear that when you saw the interview with Wade and others on the Heat team, you could see their admiration for him.

Personally, I think the Celts as a team are even more focused and motivated than they were before because of Rondo. This next game will be so telling. Celts seem to be doing all the right things that disrupt the Heat. I'd love to see Pierce and Garnett have another game like that last one.

All bets are off. Celts might wrestle this one out to a game 7.
 
 
@Ragman,

it almost looked like miami eased up when rondo came back in, like they were afraid of hurting him again...

KG & pierce were in their comfort zones all night.
ray was frustrated, commiting ticky-tack fouls and not getting any calls going his way.
JO had another great defensive game.
shaq was limited, but i think his presence gave the team and the crowd a lift.
still waiting for Baby to do something -- anything in this series...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

I think Miami unconsciously sat back on their heals thinking that they could sonserve their energy. Little did they know Rondo can beat whoever they put on him with one arm. Sheesh! Let's see what he plays like after a day or so off. Whatever it is that runs in his veins should be cloned. Man that guy has game!

Yes big Baby..seems absent without leave. However, for the Celts to move on past Miami, IMHO he needs to return to his super-sub form.

Shaq's effect, which was purely psychological, will most likely be worn off by next game. He can't even trot down the court well. When transition occurs, he's not where he needs to be so his lane-clogging usefulness is negated.
 
 
Well, Odom and Bynum sure went out like punk bitches. I really dislike Kobe, so I don't care anything at all about him getting swept, but I feel a little (emphasis on little) sorry for Phil's career ending like this.
 
 
@snood,

The odor of spoiled brat-team wafted over the Lakers this year
 
 
@panzade,

zero motivation to try getting coach one last ring...

 
 
 
MRI + cat scan on rondo's elbow negative...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
MRI + cat scan on rondo's elbow negative...

 

Dang, that's amazing considering how the injury happened...
 
 
@snood,

a good trainer makes all the difference.

age 18 i dislocated my thumb playing hoops at a gym.
there was a trainer/medical guy there, and he popped it back into place.
but i couldn't use it for 6 weeks, and to this day i still get the occasional sharp pain in that hand...
 
 
@Region Philbis,

 
a good trainer makes all the difference.

age 18 i dislocated my thumb playing hoops at a gym.
there was a trainer/medical guy there, and he popped it back into place.
but i couldn't use it for 6 weeks, and to this day i still get the occasional sharp pain in that hand...

 

Theat's what I mean - the fact that he returned right away, and that he's slated to play Monday. I played organized and pick-up basketball for many years and had dislocations, breaks, tears, and multiple contusions, scrapes, cuts and bruises. The kind of injury that Rondo absorbed is just not something I would have thought someone would immediately play after. I've heard several ex-players and commentators say the same thing. I don't care what kind of trainers, cortisone shots, or advisors he has - his resolute decision that he was going to play came from no place but that man's heart. I haven't seen anything quite like that since the 1970 Willis Reed injury/comeback, although Rondo's reentry into the game didn't impact as much as Reed's.
 
 
@snood,

 
injury/comeback, although Rondo's reentry into the game didn't impact as much as Reed's.
 
i thought this was more impressive than reed's, because rondo played the entire 4th quarter and threw caution to the wind,
diving for loose balls, dunking, and what-not...
the kid has ice-water in his veins !
 
 
speaking of rondo...

 Rondo & Garnett part of NBA's 2010-11 All-Defensive First Team 
 
 
@Region Philbis,

The Celts are keeping this game too close.

Less then 3 minutes and its tied at 81.
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Miami up by two with 48 seconds on the clock.  
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Overtime....  
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Oh Celts! You pitiful fools!  
 
 
@tsarstepan,

Yup. They shot one for six with 4 turnovers in overtime.
Major choke and most probably the final gasp.
 
 
@panzade,

unlike game 3, the heat actually asserted themselves last night.
the C's O lost all structural integrity down the stretch...
 
 
Still scratching my head over the end of the game.
Wha hoppen?
 
 
@George,

I hear...the sound of crumbling - that same sound I heard at the Berlin Wall.

I'm predicting a spirited next game... perhaps a Celt win. Sadly in that game, Garnett and Pierce coughed it up in regulation time and o/t.
 
 
@Region Philbis,

Speaking of Rondo and ice, Rondo had to delay and take off his skates when he went back out there and played. He thought he was a hockey player.

That goes down as one of my all-time Celt's-tough-guys moves - along with Havliceks' sore shoulder return to the floor back in playoffs a few decades ago.
 
 
@Ragman,

in the end the C's had no answer for wade & lebron.
once pierce got his 2nd foul two minutes into the game, i knew we were in trouble.
i haven't read any articles yet, but apparently rondo didn't play in the 4th
due to back and shoulder injuries.
he also must have felt it when he ran into james jones bad-elbow first.
they were saying shaq might have to call it a career.
the one shred of good news is doc said he's leaning towards returning next year...
 
 
A few observations from a Heat fan:

1.The Heat were closers. James had 10 consecutive points to end the game. The Heat scored 16 consecutive points to slam the door shut.

2. If there was too much celebration for a conference semi final it was because of the respect the Heat had for the Celts.

3. Let's not forget that the Celtics drew up the original blueprint for a Big 3 team. The Heat were forced to do the same.

4. All the vitriol and jealousy directed at the Heat only makes them stronger and more determined.

Bring on the Bulls!!
 
 
@panzade,

 
... 4. All the vitriol and jealousy directed at the Heat only makes them
stronger and more determined...
 

That's OK.
I have enough jealosy and vitriol left for the rest of the playoffs.
I intend to empty the tank.
 
 
@George,

That's ok. feed the monster!
 
 
Gawd, us Celts fans are a dedicated fanatical lot, aren't we!

I hope I see more heat from Heat fans 'cause they got a good balanced team - maybe even a championship-calibre-team. Let's see them carry forth their pan to go all the way to finals.

My prediction is: Dallas Mavs and Heat in finals with 6-game-series - wrapping up with Miami Heatles winning the whole enchilada.
 
 
@Ragman,

I'm thinking Bulls-Mavs. I like the Heat but they need a seasoning season. Maybe next year.
 
 
@panzade,

Trouble with the Bulls is their balance. Bulls struggle mightily for offense...once you get past Rose. in the playoffs that balance becomes key. Defense and stops are important, particularly in last quarter of the game. Just ask the Celts.
 
 
@Ragman,

That's a good point.
 
 
I say Heat/Mavs in a 7 game barnburner, with Mavs coming out on top.
 
 
@panzade,

That being said, though, I love watching Rose. Hes a lot of fun to watch play as he releases his shot against...well..ANYONE!
 
 
@snood,

Dirk is a tour de force, isn't he? I dare say, Bill Walton-esque?
 
 
@Ragman,

 
Dirk is a tour de force, isn't he? I dare say, Bill Walton-esque?

 

I just think the combination of frustration from years of never winning the title, good additions to the team for defense and aggressiveness, and yes, Nowinski's talent and consistency will give them momentum this time.

I don't know about comparing him to Walton, though. I always kinda felt like Bill was overrated as a player, and I didn't like the know-it-all-pundit -with-rightwing-leanings persona he took on.
 
 
@snood,

Dirk is one of the most underrated players. He has heart and a passion for the game. So do the Mavs. I see them coming out on top.
 
 
@snood,

umm...lefty Bill went righty? Is this the same guy who was a far-lefty-SLA sympathizer and helped hide Patty Hearst? When did that happen? I must have been out that day in the news cycle. Are you sure "Grateful Red" as he is known is the same one here? He's no Ted Nugent.

In his playing days, when his feet and injuries weren't hobbling him, Bill W was one the top 5 Centers of ALL time! I had followed him from his days at UCLA. He was one of the few big men that could dribble, pass, shot-block, rebound and defend. When his feet weren't totally messed up, he was amazing. Witness the last years with the Celtics when he was part of their championship (Parrish, Bird, McHale etc). His 15 minutes per game was amazing and made for a seamless transition from either McHale or Parish.

"Providing a reliable backup to McHale and Parish, Walton played in a career-high 80 games and received the NBA Sixth Man Award that season en route to the NBA Championship, becoming the only player to have ever won an NBA Finals MVP, Sixth Man Award, and regular season MVP."

If you can set aside all that other mound of stuff, you'd see a truly transcendant Hall of Famer. It happens to be coupled with a Hall-of-Shame mouth.
 
 
@Ragman,

 
umm...lefty Bill went righty? Is this the same guy who was a far-lefty-SLA sympathizer and helped hide Patty Hearst? When did that happen? I must have been out that day in the news cycle. Are you sure "Grateful Red" as he is known is the same one here? He's no Ted Nugent.

In his playing days, when his feet and injuries weren't hobbling him, Bill W was one the top 5 Centers of ALL time! I had followed him from his days at UCLA. He was one of the few big men that could dribble, pass, shot-block, rebound and defend. When his feet weren't totally messed up, he was amazing. Witness the last years with the Celtics when he was part of their championship (Parrish, Bird, McHale etc). His 15 minutes per game was amazing and made for a seamless transition from either McHale or Parish.

"Providing a reliable backup to McHale and Parish, Walton played in a career-high 80 games and received the NBA Sixth Man Award that season en route to the NBA Championship, becoming the only player to have ever won an NBA Finals MVP, Sixth Man Award, and regular season MVP."

If you can set aside all that other mound of stuff, you'd see a truly transcendant Hall of Famer. It happens to be coupled with a Hall-of-Shame mouth.

 

Maybe its because he followed my basketball idol Lew Alcindor (AKA Kareem Abdul-Jabaar) at UCLA and I had to listen to comparisons between the two that I thought were totally bogus. I know he had a couple of outstanding NBA years, but I always felt like a little too much was made of it, especially if you compared his achievements and production to... say, Jabaar's.

And yes, I think his views have changed a lot since his halcyon hippie days. I'll research it and get back to you, but I could swear I've heard some pretty O'Reilly-esque things coming out of his mouth over the last several years.

<Edit> Well, I guess you're right - it appears he does still lean to the left, from what I could find. I don't really know where I got the "rightie" impression from...
 
 
@snood,

OK... I understand where you are coming from on that. I've not heard anything righty from him. He's aware enough that it would wear pretty poorly on his credibility (I would think).

Well, remember in a head-to-head Jabbar-Walton matchup in Portland Blazer championship days he took Jabbar to school and beat him. He was a force to be reckoned with. However, he still holds the record for the longest time on injured-DNP-list for an NBA career.

I think something made too much of is these pseudo-intellectual celebs or sports figures who express their opinions on the national policies of the day. Why should I care what Walton or Charles Barkley has to say about politics. They are jocks...not anything more. Jokey jocks at that.
 
 
@Ragman,

 
Well, remember in a head-to-head Jabbar-Walton matchup in Portland Blazer championship days he took Jabbar to school and beat him.
 

Let's don't totally re-write history in favor of our favorites, here. Yes, the Trailblazers swept a weak Lakers team that year, but the head-to-head matchup was still dominated by Kareem. The stats don't lie.

Here's the series matchup stats:
Kareem - 30.3 ppg, 16 rpg, 3.8 apg, 3.8 bpg, 60.8 FG%
Walton: 19.3 ppg, 14.8 rpg, 5.8 apg, 2.3 bpg, 51 FG%.
 http://realbasketballtalk.motionsforum.com/t7363-bill-walton-vs-kareem-abdul-jabbar-1977-western-conference-finals-match-up 

The Lakers had lost their only other rebounder - Kermit Washington, and they got badly beaten in the backcourt. Bill Walton had more assists, but then, he had people to pass to. After he dunked once with Kareem in the vicinity, the sportscasters were all a-twitter with "Kareem is through!".
Kareem got a much stronger supporting cast in about 2 years - one of whom was a guy named Earvin Johnson. Walton got a ring and had a couple good years. But he never - ever - outplayed Jabbar head-to-head.
 
 
@snood,

Ok...debating this a bit more:

If you can somehow put aside his injury time-outs, some people list 9 other better centers. IMHO, I'm not sure there was a better defensive center besides Bill Russell.

I'll give you this..that Kareem was a better center. Perhaps he was the number one overall center :

Bill Russell
Wilt Chamberlain

Moses Malone
Olajuwon?
Shaq
David Robinson
Willis Reed

"Walton would have been higher on this list had he had a healthy career. However, he could never stay healthy, as he only played in 468 career games. The fact that he still made the list shows you how great he really was. He had career averages of 13.3 points, 10.5 rebounds, 3.4 assists, 2.2 blocks, and 0.8 steals in only 28 minutes per game.

He also shot a fantastic 52.1 percent from the field and 66 percent from the free-throw line. He is generally considered as the greatest passing big man of all time, and one of the best defensive centers as well."
 
 
@Ragman,

Ragman - I wasn't "debating" about who was the best center of all time, or however you're framing this now. That's a whole 'nother thread, or discussion. I was disputing your assertion that Walton "Schooled" Kareem in the '77 finals, that's all.

There was a lot of that kind of talk during those years- that Walton was somehow a better, more fundamental player than Kareem - and I think maybe that's the mindset you're coming from.

I think a lot of it was because Kareem didn't endear himself to the press, and was considered sullen and militant. I think a lot of people wanted Walton to be a better player than Jabbar so they could have someone to look up to - but all their wishing (or yours) didn't make it so then, or now.
 
 
On another, slightly less contentious note...

What's everyone's feelings on the Bulls' chances against Miami?
 
 
@snood,

well, let's start with the way Miami manhandled the Hawks in the regular season:

Game 1 on Dec 4 Miami won 89-77
Game 2 on Jan 18 Hawks won 93-89
Game 3 on March 18 Miami won 106-85
Game 4 on April 11 Miami won 98-90

Did the Hawks improve enough to give the Bulls all they could handle?

How much gas is left in the Bulls bus and how has the long rest helped the Heat?
 
 
@panzade,

So, it sounds like you don't think their chances are that great. Judging solely from their regular season record against the Heat, I would have to agree. However, it is pretty commonly accepted that teams' mindsets tend to change - to intensify and focus - in the playoffs. I'm hoping that the Bulls have a better postseason than regular season.
 
 
@snood,

If the Bulls have a better post-season they'll win it all.

The sweep is a factor but the Heat were missing some key players so it might not matter

The team's are very evenly matched
Bulls: Offense 105.4 (12th in NBA); Defense 97.4 (1st in NBA)
Heat: Offense 109.3 (3rd in NBA); Defense: 100.8 (5th in NBA)

It'll go 7 but I don't know who will win.
 
 
@snood,

i lose interest when my team's not in it.

glad to see coach rivers inked a 5-year extension...
 
 
@snood,

I never said you were debating it. I was proposing and trying to have a sports debate. You're attempting to have a different kind of discussion.

I didn't and don't 'wish' it. However, you seem to want to turn to this into a race issue. Where I clearly admitted to Jabbar being the number one center of all time. I liked Jabbar then and now.

So where is this wish you say I allegedly have?

My prediction :
Miami Heat over the Bulls in 6 games.
 
 
@Ragman,

 
I never said you were debating it. I was proposing and trying to have a sports debate. You're attempting to have a different kind of discussion.

I didn't and don't 'wish' it. However, you seem to want to turn to this into a race issue. Where I clearly admitted to Jabbar being the number one center of all time. I liked Jabbar then and now.

So where is this wish you say I allegedly have?

My prediction :
Miami Heat over the Bulls in 6 games.

 

If that's the way you see the exchange we just had, that's fine with me. I happen to think you made an unfounded statement about Walton "schooling" Jabbar, I simply disagreed and explained why. I'll stand by the observations I made about the way Jabbar and Walton were treated in the press, and I'm not trying to "make" it about anything.

And I'd be pleased as punch to just keep this about current basketball events.
 
 
@snood,

me too. that was my intent.
 
 
@Ragman,

 
... My prediction :
Miami Heat over the Bulls in 6 games.
 

I'll take the Heat in five.
 
 
